Washington statutes.
RCW 9.02.140

State regulation.

Any regulation promulgated by the state relating to abortion shall be valid only if:

(1) The regulation is medically necessary to protect the life or health of the pregnant individual who is terminating the pregnancy,

(2) The regulation is consistent with established medical practice, and

(3) Of the available alternatives, the regulation imposes the least restrictions on the pregnant individual's right to have an abortion as defined by RCW 9.02.100 through 9.02.170 and 9.02.900 through 9.02.902.

[ 2022 c 65 s 5; 1992 c 1 s 5 (Initiative Measure No. 120, approved November 5, 1991).]

NOTES:

Legislative affirmation—2022 c 65: See note following RCW 9.02.100.